Utah statutes.
58-17b-612.   Supervision -- Pharmacist-in-charge.

(1) (a)  Any pharmacy, except a wholesaler, distributor, out-of-state mail service pharmacy, or class E pharmacy, shall be under the general supervision of at least one pharmacist licensed to practice in Utah.  One pharmacist licensed in Utah shall be designated as the pharmacist-in-charge, whose responsibility it is to oversee the operation of the pharmacy.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection 58-17b-102(66), a supervising pharmacist does not have to be in the pharmacy or care facility but shall be available via a telepharmacy system for immediate contact with the supervised pharmacy technician or pharmacy intern if:

(i)  the pharmacy is located in:

(A)  a remote rural hospital, as defined in Section 26-21-13.6; or

(B)  a clinic located in a remote rural county with less than 20 people per square mile;

(ii)  the supervising pharmacist described in Subsection (1)(a) is not available; and

(iii)  the telepharmacy system maintains records and files quarterly reports as required by division rule to assure that patient safety is not compromised.

(2)  Each out-of-state mail service pharmacy shall designate and identify to the division a pharmacist holding a current license in good standing issued by the state in which the pharmacy is located and who serves as the pharmacist-in-charge for all purposes under this chapter.

